Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2,274
Notice or order; service; contents; hearings; procedure.

(1) Any notice or order provided for in the Nebraska Pure Food Act shall be served on the permitholder at the last-known address of the permitholder or at the permitted location. A copy of the notice and the order shall be filed in the records of the department.

(2) A notice to comply provided for in section 81-2,273 shall set forth the acts or omissions with which the permitholder is charged.

(3) A notice of the permitholder's right to a hearing provided for in the act shall set forth the time and place of the hearing except as provided in subsection (4) of section 81-2,273. A notice of the permitholder's right to such hearing shall include notice that a permitholder's right to a hearing may be waived pursuant to subsection (5) of this section. A notice of the permitholder's right to a hearing to show cause why the permit should not be revoked shall include notice to the permitholder that the permit may be revoked or suspended, that the permitholder may be subject to an order of probation, or that the permit may be suspended and the permitholder subject to an order of probation, if the director determines such action is more appropriate. A notice of the permitholder's right to a hearing to show cause why the permit should not be suspended shall include notice to the permitholder that the permit may be suspended or that the permitholder may also be subject to an order of probation if the director determines such action is more appropriate.

(4) The hearings provided for in the act shall be conducted by the director at the time and place he or she designates. The director shall make a final finding based upon the complete hearing record and issue an order. If the director has suspended a permit pursuant to subsection (4) of section 81-2,273, the director shall sustain, modify, or rescind the order. All hearings shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

(5) A permitholder shall be deemed to waive the right to a hearing if such permitholder does not come to the hearing at the time and place set forth in the notice described in subsection (3) of this section without requesting the director at least two days before the designated time to change the time and place for the hearing, except that before an order of the director becomes final, the director may designate a different time and place for the hearing if the permitholder shows the director that the permitholder had a justifiable reason for not coming to the hearing and not timely requesting a change in the time and place for such hearing. If the permitholder waives the right to a hearing, the director shall make a final finding based upon the available information and issue an order. If the director has suspended a permit pursuant to subsection (4) of section 81-2,273, the director shall sustain, modify, or rescind the order.

(6) Any person aggrieved by the finding of the director shall have ten days from the entry of the director's order to request a new hearing if such person can show that a mistake of fact has been made which affected the director's determination. Any order of the director shall become final upon the expiration of ten days after its entry if no request for a new hearing is made.

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 43;

Laws 2025, LB245, § 10.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.